Hawaii statutes.
§431:12-109 Cancellation and nonrenewal.
Except as provided by section 431:12-108, no policy of an individual employee
or participation of an employee in a group policy shall be cancelled or its
renewal denied unless a thirty-day written notice of cancellation or renewal is
given the employee. All such notices shall set forth the reasons for the
cancellation or nonrenewal. The insurer, prior to the expiration of the
thirty-day period, shall afford the employer a reasonable opportunity to
consult with the insured and to present facts in opposition to cancellation or
nonrenewal. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §103]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next